Utah statutes.
19-2-109.1.   Operating permit required -- Emissions fee -- Implementation.
(1)  As used in this section and Sections 19-2-109.2 and 19-2-109.3:
(a)  "EPA" means the federal Environmental Protection Agency.
(b)  "1990 Clean Air Act" means the federal Clean Air Act as amended in 1990.
(c)  "Operating permit" means a permit issued by the executive secretary to
sources of air pollution that meet the requirements of Titles IV and V of the
1990 Clean Air Act.
(d)  "Program" means the air pollution operating permit program established
under this section to comply with Title V of the 1990 Clean Air Act.
(e)  "Regulated pollutant" has the same meaning as defined in Title V of the
1990 Clean Air Act and implementing federal regulations.
(2) (a)  A person may not operate any source of air pollution required to have
a permit under Title V of the 1990 Clean Air Act without having obtained an
operating permit from the executive secretary under procedures the board
establishes by rule.
(b)  A person is not required to submit an operating permit application until
the governor has submitted an operating permit program to the EPA.
(c)  Any operating permit issued under this section may not become effective
until the day after the EPA issues approval of the permit program or November
15, 1995, whichever occurs first.
(3) (a)  Operating permits issued under this section shall be for a period of
five years unless the board makes a written finding, after public comment and
hearing, and based on substantial evidence in the record, that an operating
permit term of less than five years is necessary to protect the public health
and the environment of the state.
(b)  The executive secretary may issue, modify, or renew an operating permit
only after providing public notice, an opportunity for public comment, and an
opportunity for a public hearing.
(c)  The executive secretary shall, in conformity with the 1990 Clean Air Act
and implementing federal regulations, revise the conditions of issued
operating permits to incorporate applicable federal regulations in conformity
with Section 502(b)(9) of the 1990 Clean Air Act, if the remaining period of
the permit is three or more years.
(d)  The executive secretary may terminate, modify, revoke, or reissue an
operating permit for cause.
(4) (a)  The board shall establish a proposed annual emissions fee that
conforms with Title V of the 1990 Clean Air Act for each ton of regulated
pollutant, applicable to all sources required to obtain a permit.  The
emissions fee established under this section is in addition to fees assessed
under Section 19-2-108 for issuance of an approval order.
(b)  In establishing the fee the board shall comply with the provisions of
Section  63J-1-504 that require a public hearing and require the established
fee to be submitted to the Legislature for its approval as part of the
department's annual appropriations request.
(c)  The fee shall cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs required to
develop and administer the program and the small business assistance program
established under Section 19-2-109.2.  The board shall prepare an annual
report of the emissions fees collected and the costs covered by those fees
under this Subsection (4).
(d)  The fee shall be established uniformly for all sources required to obtain
an operating permit under the program and for all regulated pollutants.
(e)  The fee may not be assessed for emissions of any regulated pollutant if
the emissions are already accounted for within the emissions of another
regulated pollutant.
(f)  An emissions fee may not be assessed for any amount of a regulated
pollutant emitted by any source in excess of 4,000 tons per year of that
regulated pollutant.
(5)  Emissions fees for the period:
(a)  of July 1, 1992, through June 30, 1993, shall be based on the most recent
emissions inventory prepared by the executive secretary; and
(b)  on and after July 1, 1993, but prior to issuance of an operating permit,
shall be based on the most recent emissions inventory, unless a source elects
prior to July 1, 1992, to base the fee on allowable emissions, if applicable
for a regulated pollutant.
(6)  After an operating permit is issued the emissions fee shall be based on
actual emissions for a regulated pollutant unless a source elects, prior to
the issuance or renewal of a permit, to base the fee during the period of the
permit on allowable emissions for that regulated pollutant.
(7)  If the owner or operator of a source subject to this section fails to
timely pay an annual emissions fee, the executive secretary may:
(a)  impose a penalty of not more than 50% of the fee, in addition to the fee,
plus interest on the fee computed at 12% annually; or
(b)  revoke the operating permit.
(8)  The owner or operator of a source subject to this section may contest an
emissions fee assessment or associated penalty in an adjudicative hearing
under the Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and Section
19-1-301, as provided in this Subsection (8).
(a)  The owner or operator must pay the fee under protest prior to being
entitled to a hearing.  Payment of an emissions fee or penalty under protest
is not a waiver of the right to contest the fee or penalty under this section.
(b)  A request for a hearing under this Subsection (8) shall be made after
payment of the emissions fee and within six months after the emissions fee was
due.
(9)  To reinstate an operating permit revoked under Subsection (7) the owner
or operator shall pay all outstanding emissions fees, a penalty of not more
than 50% of all outstanding fees, and interest on the outstanding emissions
fees computed at 12% annually.
(10)  All emissions fees and penalties collected by the department under this
section shall be deposited in the General Fund as the Air Pollution Operating
Permit Program dedicated credit to be used solely to pay for the reasonable
direct and indirect costs incurred by the department in developing and
administering the program and the small business assistance program under
Section 19-2-109.2.
(11)  Failure of the executive secretary to act on any operating permit
application or renewal is a final administrative action only for the purpose
of obtaining judicial review by any of the following persons to require the
executive secretary to take action on the permit or its renewal without
additional delay:
(a)  the applicant;
(b)  any person who participated in the public comment process; or
(c)  any other person who could obtain judicial review of that action under
applicable law.
